New Jersey, session 221, A4793.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State Agriculture Development Committee shall develop educational materials for owners or operators of commercial farms regarding the benefits of participating in New Jerseys farmland preservation program, and provide copies of the educational materials to each municipality in the State. b.    The municipal tax collector or the municipal tax assessor shall provide a copy of the educational materials prepared by the State Agriculture Development Committee to each owner or operator of a commercial farm located within the municipality upon submission, by the owner or operator of a commercial farm, of an application for farmland assessment, and shall make widely available copies of the educational material at publicly accessible municipal buildings.  The educational materials shall include, but need not be limited to, handouts and pamphlets. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.